Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4322
Bonds; amount.

A risk management pool may from time to time issue its bonds in such principal amounts as its board of directors deems necessary to provide sufficient funds to carry out any of the risk management pool's purposes and powers, including the establishment or increase of reserves and the payment of all other costs or expenses of the risk management pool incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out its purposes and powers.

Laws 1987, LB 398, § 22.